Utah statutes.
62A-15-402.   Rules for substance use disorder peer support specialist training and certification.

In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act the division shall make rules:

(1)  establishing a peer support services program for substance use disorder peer support services, including peer support specialist qualifications and peer support certification training curriculum;

(2)  establishing the scope of work and supervision requirements for peer support specialists; and

(3)  establishing criteria or guidelines for certifying and recertifying:

(a)  a peer support specialist certification seminar; and

(b)  a peer support specialist training course.



Enacted by Chapter 179, 2012 General Session

